District of Columbia statutes.
32-516

Applicability.

The rights and responsibilities established by this chapter shall apply:

(1)

During the 3-year period beginning 180 days from October 3, 1990, to any employer who employs 50 or more persons in the District; and

(2)

After the 3-year period beginning 180 days from October 3, 1990, to any employer who employs 20 or more persons in the District.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 17, 37 DCR 5043

History

1981 Ed., § 36-1316.

Prior Codifications